Utah statutes.
65A-8a-104.   Notification of intent to conduct forest practices.
(1)  No later than 30 days prior to an operator commencing forest practices,
the operator shall notify the division of the operator's intent to conduct
forest practices.
(2)  The notification shall include:
(a)  the name and address of the operator;
(b)  the name and address of the landowner;
(c)  a legal description of the area in which the forest practices are to be
conducted; and
(d)  a description of the proposed forest practices to be conducted, including
the number of acres with timber to be harvested.
(3)  Upon the receipt of notification, the division shall, within 10 days,
mail to the landowner and the operator:
(a)  an acknowledgment of notification;
(b)  information on Forest Water Quality Guidelines; and
(c)  any other information the division believes would assist the landowner
and operator in conducting forest practices.
